Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-161.02
Officers and employees of state; employer; granting of rights of veteran; effect.

The employer shall not incur any liability to any person whose employment is terminated, or whose seniority, status, or other employment rights are curtailed as the result of the granting to a veteran of all the rights assured him under the provisions of section 55-161.

Laws 1972, LB 1510, § 3.